California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
-------------------------------------------

77496.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any section, clause, or part of this chapter is for any reason held unconstitutional or invalid as applied to any person or as applied under certain circumstances, that decision shall not affect the remaining portions of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any other persons or under any other circumstance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77497.

The termination of this chapter shall not affect or waive any right, duty, obligation, or liability that has arisen or that may thereafter arise in connection with this chapter, release or extinguish any violation of this chapter, or affect or impair any right or remedies of the commission with respect to any violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805, Sec. 1.   Effective October 4, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Continuation or Suspension and Termination [77498. - 77500.]

77498.

Every five years, commencing with the 1999–2000 marketing season, the director shall hold a hearing to determine whether the operation of this chapter should be continued. If the director finds after the hearing that a substantial question exists among the producers, processors, and shippers assessed under this chapter regarding whether the operation of this chapter should be continued, the director shall submit the chapter to a reapproval referendum. If a reapproval referendum is required, the operation of this chapter shall be continued in effect if the director finds that a majority of the eligible producers, processors, and shippers voting in the referendum voted in favor of continuing this chapter. In finding whether the commission is continued pursuant to this article, the vote of any nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association that is authorized by its members to so vote shall be considered as being the approval or rejection by the individual members of, or the individual stockholders in, the nonprofit agricultural cooperative marketing association.

If the director finds after conducting a hearing that no substantial question exists or that a favorable vote has been given, the director shall so certify and this chapter shall remain operative. If the director finds that a favorable vote has not been given, he or she shall so certify and declare the operation of this chapter and the commission suspended upon the expiration of the marketing season ending January 31, 2000. Thereupon, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and funds distributed in the manner provided in Section 77499.5. No bond or security shall be required for any such referendum.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77501 (as added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805) by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77498.5.

Following a hearing, and favorable referendum if required, conducted prior to January 31, 2000, the process specified in Section 77498 shall be conducted by the commission every fifth year thereafter between February 1 and June 30, unless a referendum is conducted as the result of a petition pursuant to Section 77499. In that case, the hearing, and referendum if required, shall be conducted every fifth year following the industry petitioned referendum.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77502 (as added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805) by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77499.

(a) Upon a finding by a two-thirds vote of the commission that the operation of this chapter has not tended to effectuate its declared purposes, the commission may recommend to the director that the commission be suspended. Any suspension shall not become effective until the expiration of the current marketing season.

(b) The director shall, upon receipt of a recommendation, or may, after a public hearing to review a petition filed with him or her requesting such suspension, signed by 15 percent of the producers, processors, or shippers by number who produced, processed, or shipped not less than 15 percent of the volume in the immediately preceding season, cause a referendum to be conducted among the listed producers, processors, and shippers to determine if the operations of the commission shall be suspended. However, the director shall not hold a referendum as a result of the petition unless the petitioner shows by the weight of evidence that this chapter has not effectuated its declared purposes.

(c) The director shall establish a referendum period, which shall not be less than 10 or more than 60 days in duration. The director may prescribe additional procedures necessary to conduct the referendum. At the close of the established referendum period, the director shall tabulate the ballots filed during the period. If at least 40 percent of the total number of producers, processors, and shippers from the list established by the director participate in the referendum, the director shall suspend the operation of this chapter, if the director finds either one of the following:

(1) Sixty-five percent or more of the producers, processors, and shippers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and the producers, processors, and shippers so voting marketed a majority of the total quantity of strawberries marketed in the preceding marketing season by all of the producers, processors, and shippers who voted in the referendum.

(2) That a majority of the producers, processors, and shippers who voted in the referendum voted in favor of suspension, and that the producers, processors, and shippers so voting marketed 65 percent or more of the total quantity of strawberries marketed in the preceding season by all of the producers, processors, and shippers who voted in the referendum.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77503 (as added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805) by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 60.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77499.5.

After the effective date of suspension of this chapter and of the commission, the operations of the commission shall be concluded and all moneys held by the commission, and moneys collected by assessment and not required to defray the expenses of concluding and terminating operations of the commission, shall be returned upon a pro rata basis to all persons from whom assessments were collected in the immediately preceding current marketing season. However, if the commission finds that the amounts returnable are so small as to make impractical the computation and remitting of the pro rata refund to those persons, any moneys remaining and any moneys remaining after payment of all expenses of winding up and terminating operations shall be withdrawn from the approved depository and paid into an appropriate state or federal program or used to fund activities related to the subject matter of this chapter.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77504 (as added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805) by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 61.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77500.

Upon suspension of the operation of this chapter and of the commission, the commission shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension to all producers, processors, and shippers affected by the suspension whose names and addresses are on file.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 77505 (as added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 805) by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 62.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. California Forest Products Commission [77501. - 77666.]



  ARTICLE 1. Declaration and General Provisions [77501. - 77507.]

77501.

The production and marketing of forest products constitute an important industry of this state; the industry provides substantial and necessary revenues for the state and employment for its citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77502.

The maintenance of the forest products industry of California is necessary to ensure the public of a continuous supply of forest products and the maintenance of needed levels of income for those persons engaged in the industry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77503.

The production and marketing of forest products produced in this state is hereby declared to be affected with a public interest. This chapter is enacted in the exercise of the police power of this state for the purpose of protecting the health, peace, safety, and general welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77504.

No action taken by the commission, or by any individual in accordance with this chapter or with the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter, is a violation of the so-called Cartwright Act (Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16700) of Part 2 of Division 7 of the Business and Professions Code), the Unfair Practices Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 17000) of that Part 2), or any statutory or common law against monopolies or combinations in restraint of trade.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77505.

This chapter shall be liberally construed. If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held to be invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77506.

It is hereby declared as a matter of legislative determination that members of the commission are intended to represent and further the interest of a particular industry concerned and that this representation and furtherance is intended to serve the public interest. Accordingly, the Legislature finds that, with respect to persons who are elected or appointed to the commission, the particular industry concerned is tantamount to, and constitutes, the public generally within the meaning of Section 87103 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77506.5.

The forest products industry in this state is expanding. The success and expansion of the industry is uniquely dependent upon effective promotion, public information and education, and research because the creation of new markets is essentially a matter of educating and informing people regarding a previously underrecognized industry. The forest products industry also provides an important source of jobs for many people in this state, a high proportion of whom reside in historically depressed areas of the state, and serves to ensure the preservation of an agrarian society.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 114.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77507.

The commission form of administration created by this chapter is uniquely situated to provide those engaged in the production of forest products the opportunity to avail themselves of the benefits of collective action in the broad fields of generic product promotion of forest products, public information and education, and research necessary to achieve the purposes stated herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 115.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [77521. - 77531.]

77521.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77522.

“Books and records” means books, records, contracts, documents, memoranda, papers, correspondence, or other written data pertaining to matters relating to the activities subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77523.

“Commission” means the California Forest Products Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77524.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 116.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77525.

“Ex officio” means a nonvoting member of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77526.

“Marketing year” or “fiscal year” means the period beginning January 1 of any year and extending through December 31 of the same year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77527.

“Person” means an individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, firm, company, or other entity doing business in California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 133.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

77528.

(a) “Producer” means any person who owns timber in California immediately prior to felling, or the first person who acquires either the legal title or beneficial title to timber after it has been felled from land owned in California by a federal agency, or any other person, agency, or entity exempt from property taxation under federal or state law.

“Producer” includes any person who owns or acquires legal title or beneficial title to downed timber in this state and also includes the seller of timber located on land in the state owned by that seller if the timber sales agreement, contract, or other document provides for the payment of the purchase price on the basis of actual timber volume scaled and does not contain a passage of title clause.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, a person in California that owns, controls, or is affiliated with any other person engaged in the selling or acquiring of timber in California in any marketing year shall be considered to be the producer of all timber sold or acquired by that person.

“Affiliate” or “affiliated with” means a person who directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common control of another person.

“Control” means the possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of any person.

(c) “Producer” does not include any person who sells or acquires in any marketing year less than 5,000,000 board feet net Scribner Decimal C log rule, or the equivalent thereof as determined by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1127, Sec. 3.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77529.

“Product promotion” means the generic promotion of forest products in domestic and foreign markets. “Product promotion” does not include reference to either unprocessed logs sold in foreign markets or to rough-sawn products sold in foreign markets for remanufacture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77530.

“Research” means any economic, cultural, or biological search, inquiry, examination, investigation, or experimentation, or any other search, inquiry, examination, investigation, or experimentation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77531.

“Timber” or “forest products” means trees of any species maintained for eventual harvest whether planted or of natural growth, standing or down, on privately or publicly owned land, and also includes wood products related thereto, but does not mean nursery stock.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The California Forest Products Commission [77541. - 77555.]

77541.

(a) There is in the state government the California Forest Products Commission. The commission is composed of 10 members.

(b) Three producers shall be elected by and from producers of 5,000,000 to 20,000,000, inclusive, board feet net Scribner Decimal C log rule, or the equivalent, thereof, in the preceding marketing year; three producers shall be elected by and from producers of between 20,000,001 to 100,000,000, inclusive, board feet net Scribner Decimal C log rule, or the equivalent, thereof, in the preceding marketing year; and three producers shall be elected by and from producers of over 100,000,000 board feet net Scribner Decimal C log rule, or the equivalent, thereof, in the preceding marketing year.

(c) One member shall be either a public member or an industry member, as determined by a majority of the producer members elected pursuant to subdivision (b). If the producer members determine that the member shall be a public member, the public member shall be appointed by the secretary from the nominees recommended by the producer members. If the producer members determine that the member shall be an industry member, the producers shall elect an industry member to the commission by majority vote.

(d) The secretary and other governmental officers, as determined by the commission, shall be ex officio members of the commission.

(e) The ex officio members are nonvoting members of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 117.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77542.

(a) The secretary may require the commission to correct or cease any existing activity or function that is determined by the secretary not to be in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter.

(b) If the commission refuses or fails to cease these activities or functions or to make corrections required by the secretary, the secretary may, upon written notice, suspend all or a portion of the activities or functions of the commission until the cessation or correction of the activities or functions, as required by the secretary, has been accomplished by the commission.

(c) Any actions of the commission in violation of the written notice are without legal force or effect. The secretary, to the extent feasible, shall issue the written notice prior to the commission entering into any contractual relationship affecting the existing or proposed activities or functions which are the subject of the written notice.

(d) At the same time the written notice is provided to the commission, the secretary shall notify the commission in writing of the specific acts that the secretary determines are not in the public interest or are in violation of this chapter, the secretary’s reasons for requiring a cessation or correction of specific existing or proposed activities or functions, and the secretary’s recommendations with respect to any action that will make the activities or functions acceptable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 118.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77543.

The commission or the secretary may bring an action for judicial relief from the secretary’s written notice, or from noncompliance by the commission with the written notice, as the case may be, in a court of competent jurisdiction, which may issue a temporary restraining order, permanent injunction, or other applicable relief.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77544.

When the secretary is required to concur in a decision of the commission, the secretary shall concur, refuse to concur, or request additional information from the commission within 15 working days from the date the secretary receives notification of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 120.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77545.

The commission shall reimburse the secretary for all expenses incurred by the secretary in carrying out his or her duties and responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. However, a court may, if it finds that the secretary has acted arbitrarily or capriciously in restricting the activities or functions of the commission, relieve the commission of the responsibility for the payment of the secretary’s legal costs with regard to that action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 121.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77546.

An alternate member to each member of the commission, except the ex officio members, shall be elected or appointed in the same manner and for the same term as the member. Except as provided in Section 77551, an alternate member shall, in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate, serve in the place of the member and shall have and exercise all of the rights, privileges, and powers of the member when serving on the commission. In the event the status of a member changes thereby making the member ineligible to serve, or in the event of the death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, the alternate member shall act as a member of the commission until a qualified successor is elected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77547.

Any vacancy on the commission occurring by the failure of any person elected or appointed to or serving on the commission as a member or alternate member to continue in his or her position because of a change in his or her status thereby making the person ineligible to serve, or because of the death, removal, resignation, or disqualification of a member, shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term by a majority vote of the remaining members of the commission. That person shall possess all of the same qualifications set forth in this article as is required for the person whose office he or she is to occupy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77548.

(a) Any producer member and his or her alternate member shall be a producer or an authorized representative of a producer. Producer members and their alternate members shall maintain their qualifications pursuant to Section 77528 during their term of office.

(b) Not more than one producer member and one alternate member shall be persons employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, the same corporation, firm, partnership, association, or business organization. Any alternate serving on the commission who is employed by, or connected in a proprietary capacity with, a person serving as a member of the commission from the same corporation, firm, partnership, association, or business organization, shall serve as an alternate to the member.

(c) The public member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member or alternate member, respectively, on the commission. The public member and his or her alternate member shall not have any financial interest in the forest products industry.

(d) The industry member and his or her alternate member on the commission shall have all the powers, rights, and privileges of any other member or alternate member, respectively, on the commission. The industry member or his or her alternate member may have a financial interest in the forest products industry. However, the industry member or his or her alternate member shall not be a producer as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 77528, or a person who sells or acquires timber but who is exempt from the meaning of “producer” pursuant to subdivision (c) of that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1127, Sec. 4.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77549.

The term of office of each member, except the ex officio members, shall be three years, commencing with the beginning of the following marketing year and until a qualified successor is elected.

However, with respect to the first producer members of the commission, one-third of each category specified in Section 77541 shall serve for one year, one-third shall serve for two years, and one-third shall serve for three years, with the determination of the term of each member within each category to be made by lot.

No member may serve more than three consecutive three-year terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1127, Sec. 5.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

77550.

The commission shall be and is hereby declared to be a corporate body. It may sue and be sued, enter into contracts, adopt a seal, and have and possess all of the powers of a corporation. Copies of its proceedings, records, and acts when authenticated, shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all statements therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77551.

A quorum of the commission shall be six members of whom at least five shall be producer members. Notwithstanding Section 77546, any alternate member may serve in the absence of any member if the member’s alternate is also absent and the action is necessary to establish a quorum. Except as provided in Section 77663, the vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting at which there is a quorum constitutes an act of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77552.

The secretary or his or her representatives shall be notified and may attend each meeting of the commission and any committee meeting of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77553.

No member, alternate member, or member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, shall receive compensation. Each member of the commission or each alternate member serving in the place of a member, except ex officio members who are officers or employees of a governmental entity, and each member of a committee established by the commission who is a nonmember of the commission, may receive per diem of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per day, as established by the commission, and may also receive necessary traveling expenses and meal allowances, as approved by the commission. The per diem, traveling expenses, and allowances may be paid for each day spent in actual attendance at, or in traveling to and from, meetings of the commission or committees of the commission, or on special assignment for the commission, as approved by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77554.

All funds received by any person from the assessments levied pursuant to this chapter or otherwise received by the commission shall be deposited in banks that the commission may designate and shall be disbursed by order of the commission through an agent designated by the commission for that purpose. The agent shall be bonded by a fidelity bond that is executed by a surety company authorized to transact business in this state, in favor of the commission, in the amount of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 214.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

77555.

The state is not liable for the acts of the commission or its contracts. Payments of all claims arising by reason of the administration of this chapter or acts of the commission are limited to the funds collected by the commission.

No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is personally liable for the contracts of the commission. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually in any way to any other person for errors in judgment, mistakes, or other acts, either of commission or of omission, as principal, agent, or employee, except for his or her own individual acts of dishonesty or crime. No member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is responsible individually for any act or omission of any other member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof.

Liability is several and not joint, and no member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof, is liable for the default of any other member of the commission, alternate member, or any employee or agent thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of the Commission [77571. - 77590.]

77571.

The powers and duties of the commission include, but are not limited to, all of those specified in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77572.

The commission may adopt and, from time to time, alter, rescind, modify, and amend bylaws, regulations, operating procedures, and orders for carrying out this chapter, including regulations for appeals from any bylaw, regulation, operating procedure, or order of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77573.

The commission may administer and enforce this chapter and do and perform all acts and exercise all powers incidental to, or in connection with, or deemed reasonably necessary for, the proper implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77574.

The commission may appoint its own officers, including a chairperson, one or more vice chairpersons, and other officers as it deems necessary. The officers shall have the powers and duties delegated to them by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77575.

The commission may employ a person to serve at the pleasure of the commission as president and chief executive officer of the commission, and other personnel, including legal counsel, necessary to carry out this chapter.

If any person employed by the commission engages in any conduct that the secretary determines is not in the public interest or that is in violation of this chapter, the secretary shall notify the commission of the conduct and request that corrective and, if appropriate, disciplinary action be taken by the commission. If the commission fails or refuses to correct the situation or to take disciplinary action satisfactory to the secretary, the secretary may suspend or discharge the person.

The commission may retain a management firm or the staff from any board, commission, or committee of the state or federal government to perform the functions prescribed by this section under the control of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 123.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77576.

The commission may fix the compensation for all of its employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77577.

The commission may appoint committees composed of both members and nonmembers of the commission to advise the commission in carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77578.

The commission may establish offices and incur expenses, enter into any and all contracts and agreements, create liabilities, and borrow funds in advance of receipt of assessments as may be necessary, in the opinion of the commission, for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter and the performance of its duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77579.

The commission shall keep accurate books, records, and accounts of all of its dealings that shall be subject to an annual audit by an auditing firm selected by the commission with the concurrence of the secretary.

A summary of the audit shall be reported to all persons subject to this chapter, a copy of which shall also be submitted to the secretary. In addition, the secretary may, as he or she determines necessary, conduct or cause to be conducted a fiscal and compliance audit of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77580.

The commission may present facts to, and negotiate with state, federal, and foreign agencies on matters which affect this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77581.

The commission may enter into contracts to receive or render services in formulating and conducting plans and programs and any other contracts or agreements that the commission may deem necessary for carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77582.

The commission may conduct, and contract with others to conduct, research, including the study, analysis, accumulation, and dissemination of information obtained from the research or elsewhere, regarding this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77583.

The commission may promote the sale of forest products by advertising and other promotional means, including cost sharing advertising, for the purpose of maintaining and expanding present markets and creating new and larger intrastate, interstate, and foreign markets for forest products and to educate and instruct the public with respect to the use of forest products. The commission may not promote the sale of unprocessed logs in foreign markets or rough-sawn products for remanufacture in foreign markets. Promotional activities for foreign export markets shall be limited exclusively to value-added forest products in finished manufactured form and may not include cants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77584.

The commission may accept contributions or match private, state, or federal funds, and employ or make contributions of funds to other persons or state or federal agencies, for purposes of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77585.

The commission may publish and distribute, without charge, bulletins or other communications to persons subject to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77586.

The commission shall establish an assessment rate to defray its operating costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

77587.

The commission shall adopt an annual budget according to generally accepted accounting practices. The secretary shall concur in the adoption of the budget prior to the encumbrance of funds, except for any obligations incurred pursuant to Section 77576.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77588.

The commission shall submit to the secretary, for his or her concurrence, an annual statement of contemplated activities authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 126.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77589.

The commission and the secretary shall keep confidential and shall not disclose, except when required by a court order after a hearing in a judicial proceeding involving this chapter, all lists in their possession of persons subject to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 127.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77590.

The commission may investigate and prosecute civil violations of this chapter and file complaints with appropriate law enforcement agencies or officers for suspected criminal violations of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 550, Sec. 1.   Effective August 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Implementation and Voting Procedures [77601. - 77609.]

77601.

(a) Within 60 days after the effective date of this chapter, the secretary shall establish a list of producers eligible to vote on the implementation of this chapter. In establishing the list, the secretary may require producers and others to submit the names and mailing addresses of all known producers. The secretary also may require that the information provided include the volume of timber sold or acquired in the preceding marketing year by persons subject to this chapter or, in the alternative, may establish procedures for receiving the information at the time of the referendum vote specified in Section 77602. The secretary may also request the assistance of the State Board of Equalization in gathering the information. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the State Board of Equalization shall provide the secretary the information that shall be used only for purposes specified in this chapter. The request for the information shall be in writing.

(b) Any producer whose name does not appear on the list may have his or her name placed on the list by filing with the secretary a signed statement identifying himself or herself as a producer. The absence of a producer’s name from the list does not exempt the person from paying assessments and does not invalidate any votes conducted pursuant to this chapter.

(c) Proponents and opponents of the commission may contact producers on the lists in a form and manner prescribed by the secretary so long as all expenses associated with the contacts are paid in advance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 727, Sec. 128.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

77602.

This chapter, except as necessary to conduct an implementation referendum vote, shall not become operative until the secretary finds, in a referendum vote conducted by the secretary, that at least 40 percent of the total number of producers from the list established by the secretary pursuant to this article participate and that either of the following has occurred:
